test/tools/tokenize-dog-in.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

% N
% V
% Foc
% Cmp
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@
% Du3
% Sg3
% ErrSpace
%#

LEXICON Root
DOG;
cat% N% Cmp%#:cat DOG;
be% V:be SPACEDOG;
leat% V% Du3:lea UNSPACEDOG;
leat% V% Sg3:leaba ENDLEX;
bedog% V:be% dog ENDLEX;

LEXICON ENDLEX
#;

LEXICON DOG
dog% N:dog ENDLEX;
ba% Foc:ba ENDLEX;

LEXICON SPACEDOG
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@:%  DOG;

LEXICON UNSPACEDOG
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@:0 DOG;
